Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2903
Local preservation ordinance or resolution; approval.

For purposes of establishing standards under subdivision (8)(b) of section 77-2902, the officer shall approve a duly adopted local preservation ordinance or resolution if such ordinance or resolution meets the following requirements:

(1) The ordinance or resolution provides for specific standards and requirements regarding building exteriors that reflect the heritage, values, and character of the political subdivision adopting such ordinance or resolution; and

(2) The ordinance or resolution requires that any building to be rehabilitated, preserved, or restored shall have been originally constructed at least fifty years prior to the proposed rehabilitation, preservation, or restoration and the facade of such building shall not have undergone material structural alteration since its original construction, unless the rehabilitation, preservation, or restoration to be performed proposes to restore the facade to substantially its original condition.

Laws 2014, LB191, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 79.